Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-212
Substantial stockholder, substantial partner, and substantial member, defined.

Substantial stockholder, substantial partner, or substantial member shall mean a stockholder of, partner in, or member of the wholesaler who owns fifty percent or more of the capital stock of a corporate wholesaler or of the partnership or the limited liability company.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 323.